Virginia statutes. Title 53.1. Prisons and Other Methods of Correction.
Chapter 13. Death Sentences.

§§ 53.1-232 through 53.1-236.
Repealed by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 344 and 345, cl. 2, effective July 1, 2021.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 344 and 345, cl. 3 provides: “That any person under a sentence of death imposed for an offense committed prior to July 1, 2021, but who has not been executed by July 1, 2021, shall have his sentence changed to life imprisonment, and such person who was 18 years of age or older at the time of the offense shall not be eligible for (i) parole, (ii) any good conduct allowance or any earned sentence credits under Chapter 6 (§

53.1-186

et seq.) of Title 53.1 of the Code of Virginia, or (iii) conditional release pursuant to §

53.1-40.01

or

53.1-40.02

of the Code of Virginia.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 344 and 345, cl. 4 provides: “That notwithstanding any other provision of law, no person may be sentenced to death or put to death on or after the effective date of this act [July 1, 2021] for any violation of law.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 344 and 345, cl. 5 provides: “That the provisions of this act may result in a net increase in periods of imprisonment or commitment. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation is $77,376 for periods of imprisonment in state adult correctional facilities and $0 for periods of commitment to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice.”

Former
§

53.1-232

, pertaining to procedures for execution of death sentence; subsequent process, derived from Code 1950, §§ 19-274, 19.1-301, 53-316; 1960, c. 366; 1972, c. 145; 1978, c. 667; 1982, c. 636.

Former
§ 53.1-232.1, pertaining to when execution dates required, derived from 1995, c. 503.

Former
§ 53.1-233, pertaining to death chamber; who to execute death sentence, derived from Code 1950, §§ 19-275, 19-302, 53-317; 1960, c. 366; 1972, c. 145; 1978, c. 667; 1982, c. 636; 1989, c. 541; 1994, c. 921; 2007, cc. 652, 737.

Former
§ 53.1-234, pertaining to transfer of prisoner; how death sentence executed; who to be present, derived from Code 1950, §§ 19-276, 19.1-303, 53-318; 1960, c. 366; 1972, c. 145; 1978, c. 667; 1982, c. 636; 1989, c. 541; 1994, c. 921; 1996, c. 679; 2007, cc. 652, 737; 2016, c. 747; 2020, c. 1166.

Former
§ 53.1-235, pertaining to certificate of execution of death sentence, derived from Code 1950, § 53-319.1; 1978, c. 451; 1982, c. 636.

Former
§ 53.1-236, pertaining to disposition of remains, derived from Code 1950, §§ 19-281, 19.1-307, 53-323; 1960, c. 366; 1972, c. 145; 1978, c. 614; 1982, c. 636.